Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,242
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 25-21,241 to 25-21,246:

(1) Action involving public petition and participation shall mean an action, claim, cross-claim, or counterclaim for damages that is brought by a public applicant or permittee and is materially related to any efforts of the defendant to report on, comment on, rule on, challenge, or oppose the application or permission;

(2) Communication shall mean any statement, claim, allegation in a proceeding, decision, protest, writing, argument, contention, or other expression;

(3) Government body shall mean a city, a village, a political subdivision, a state agency, the state, the federal government, or a public authority, board, or commission; and

(4) Public applicant or permittee shall mean any person who has applied for or obtained a permit, zoning change, lease, license, certificate, or other entitlement for use or permission to act from any government body or any person with an interest, connection, or affiliation with such person that is materially related to such application or permission.

Laws 1994, LB 665, § 2.